District of Columbia statutes.
22-4201

Technical assistance and research.

There are authorized to be appropriated to the National Institute of Justice in each fiscal year (beginning with fiscal year 1998) such sums as may be necessary for the following activities:

(1)

Research and demonstration projects, evaluations, and technical assistance to assess and analyze the crime problem in the District of Columbia, and to improve the ability of the criminal justice and other systems and entities in the District of Columbia to prevent, solve, and punish crimes.

(2)

The establishment of a locally-based corporation or institute in the District of Columbia supporting research and demonstration projects relating to the prevention, solution, or punishment of crimes in the District of Columbia, including the provision of related technical assistance.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 763, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11281

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-4201.

Effective Dates

Section 11721 of title XI of Pub. L. 105-33, 111 Stat. 786, the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, provided that except as otherwise provided in this title, the provisions of this title shall take effect on the later of October 1, 1997, or the day the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority certifies that the financial plan and budget for the District government for fiscal year 1998 meet the requirements of section 201(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, as amended by this title.